Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Medical Assistance
(State Medicaid Program)

205.510.
Definitions for medical assistance law.

As used in this chapter as it pertains to medical assistance unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Behavioral health professional” means a person authorized to provide mental health or substance use disorder services under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Chiropractor” means a person authorized to practice chiropractic under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Council” means the Advisory Council for Medical Assistance;

“Dentist” means a person authorized to practice dentistry under laws of the Commonwealth;

“Health professional” means a physician, physician assistant, nurse, doctor of chiropractic, behavioral health professional, optometrist, dentist, or allied health professional who is licensed in Kentucky;

“Medical care” as used in this chapter means essential medical, surgical, chiropractic, dental, optometric, podiatric, telehealth, and nursing services, in the home, office, clinic, or other suitable places, which are provided or prescribed by physicians, optometrists, podiatrists, or dentists licensed to render such services, including drugs and medical supplies, appliances, laboratory, diagnostic and therapeutic services, nursing-home and convalescent care, hospital care as defined in KRS 205.560(1)(a), and such other essential medical services and supplies as may be prescribed by such persons; but not including abortions, or induced miscarriages or premature births, unless in the opinion of a physician such procedures are necessary for the preservation of the life of the woman seeking such treatment or except in induced premature birth intended to produce a live viable child and such procedure is necessary for the health of the mother or her unborn child. However, this section does not authorize optometrists to perform any services other than those authorized by KRS Chapter 320;

“Nurse” means a person authorized to practice professional nursing under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Nursing home” means a facility which provides routine medical care in which physicians regularly visit patients, which provide nursing services and procedures employed in caring for the sick which require training, judgment, technical knowledge, and skills beyond that which the untrained person possesses, and which maintains complete records on patient care, and which is licensed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 216B.015;

“Optometrist” means a person authorized to practice optometry under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Other persons eligible for medical assistance” may include the categorically needy excluded from monetary payment status by state requirements and classifications of medically needy individuals as permitted by federal laws and regulations and as prescribed by administrative regulation of the secretary for health and family services or his designee;

“Pharmacist” means a person authorized to practice pharmacy under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Physician” means a person authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Podiatrist” means a person authorized to practice podiatry under the laws of the Commonwealth;

“Primary-care center” means a facility which provides comprehensive medical care with emphasis on the prevention of disease and the maintenance of the patients’ health as opposed to the treatment of disease;

“Public assistance recipient” means a person who has been certified by the Department for Community Based Services of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services as being eligible for, and a recipient of, public assistance under the provisions of this chapter;

“Telehealth” means the same as in KRS 211.332;

“Telehealth consultation” means a medical or health consultation, for purposes of patient diagnosis or treatment, that meets the definition of telehealth in this section;

“Third party” means an individual, institution, corporation, company, insurance company, personal representative, administrator, executor, trustee, or public or private agency, including, but not limited to, a reparation obligor and the assigned claims bureau under the Motor Vehicle Reparations Act, Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304, who is or may be liable to pay all or part of the medical cost of injury, disease, or disability of an applicant or recipient of medical assistance provided under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396 et seq.; and

“Vendor payment” means a payment for medical care which is paid by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services directly to the authorized person or institution which rendered medical care to an eligible recipient.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, § 3; 1960 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1; 1963 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1; 1970, ch. 78, § 1; 1972, ch. 256, § 15; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (15), (16), (19); 1974, ch. 225, § 1; 1974, ch. 308, § 38; 1976, ch. 119, § 1; 1978, ch. 140, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 135, § 28, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 252, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 426, § 194, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 32, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 376, § 3, effective July 15, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 227, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 187, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 67, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

205.512.
Authority to organize regional hospital corporations — Controlling provisions — Approval. [Repealed.]

205.514.
Standards for approval of articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

205.516.
Hospital care benefits regulation. [Repealed.]

205.518.
Hospital care fund. [Repealed.]

205.520.
Title and purpose of KRS 205.510 to 205.630 — Recovery from third parties for services rendered.

KRS 205.510 to 205.630 shall be known as the “Medical Assistance Act.”

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky recognizes and declares that it is an essential function, duty, and responsibility of the state government to provide medical care to its indigent citizenry; and it is the purpose of KRS 205.510 to 205.630 to provide such care.

Further, it is the policy of the Commonwealth to take advantage of all federal funds that may be available for medical assistance. To qualify for federal funds the secretary for health and family services may by regulation comply with any requirement that may be imposed or opportunity that may be presented by federal law. Nothing in KRS 205.510 to 205.630 is intended to limit the secretary’s power in this respect.

It is the intention of the General Assembly to comply with the provisions of Title XIX of the Social Security Act which require that the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program recover from third parties which have a legal liability to pay for care and services paid by the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program.

The Kentucky Medical Assistance Program shall be the payor of last resort and its right to recover under KRS 205.622 to 205.630 shall be superior to any right of reimbursement, subrogation, or indemnity of any liable third party.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, §§ 1, 2; 1966, ch. 134, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107 (1), (15), (16), (19); 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 8, effective February 10, 1979; 1980, ch. 188, § 124, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 252, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 248, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 426, § 195, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 228, effective June 20, 2005.

205.522.
Duty of Department for Medicaid Services and Medicaid managed care organizations to comply with specified sections of Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the provisions of KRS 304.17A-167, 304.17A-235, 304.17A-257, 304.17A-259, 304.17A-515, 304.17A-580, 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, 304.17A-607, and 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743, as applicable.

A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 20, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 143, § 2, effective January 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 106, § 6, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 10, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 201, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

205.522.
Duty of Department for Medicaid Services and Medicaid managed care organizations to comply with specified sections of Subtitle 17A of KRS Chapter 304. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act and KRS 304.17A-167, 304.17A-235, 304.17A-257, 304.17A-259, 304.17A-515, 304.17A-580, 304.17A-600, 304.17A-603, 304.17A-607, and 304.17A-740 to 304.17A-743, as applicable.

A managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS 304.17A-732.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 20, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 143, § 2, effective January 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 106, § 6, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 190, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 10, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 201, § 4, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 19, § 9, effective January 1, 2023.

205.525.
Application by cabinet for waiver, waiver amendment, or request for plan amendment — Cabinet to provide updates upon request.

Concurrent with submitting an application for a waiver or waiver amendment or a request for a plan amendment to any federal agency that approves waivers, waiver amendments, and plan amendments, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue a copy, summary, and statement of benefits of the application for a waiver or waiver amendment or request for a plan amendment.

The cabinet shall provide an update on the status of the application for a waiver or waiver amendment or request for a plan amendment upon request.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 183, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 229, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 33, effective June 29, 2017.

205.526.
Application for waiver to provide coverage to prerelease prisoners.

In the event that the cabinet seeks and receives approval of a Medicaid Section 1115 waiver under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1315 for the purpose of providing Medicaid coverage to prisoners thirty (30) days prior to their release, the cabinet shall prioritize provision of such coverage.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 182, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

205.527.
Managing of IMPACT Plus program by Medicaid managed care organization — Continuation of services for eligible children — Billing — Gaps in service and lack of access.

As used in this section, “IMPACT Plus” program means the program of community-based behavioral health services provided to an eligible IMPACT Plus recipient through an agreement between the Department for Medicaid Services and the Department for Public Health as the state agency for the federal Title V Maternal and Child Health Block Grant, 42 U.S.C. secs. 701 to 710 or as authorized under subsection (3) of this section.

Any Medicaid managed care organization that contracts with the Department for Medicaid Services shall, to the extent possible under the Title V agreement, manage aspects of the IMPACT Plus program for its members, including but not limited to the determination of a child’s eligibility for IMPACT Plus services, processing and direct payment of claims, and audits. No state agency shall duplicate any function performed by the Medicaid managed care organizations for the IMPACT Plus program. Appeals of payments shall be submitted for review to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.

Children eligible for the IMPACT Plus program may continue to receive services, if the family and provider agree, from:

An individual IMPACT Plus therapist if the child is relocated outside of the provider’s service area; and

The same provider if a child is eligible for those services, but no longer eligible for IMPACT Plus services, and the provider meets the participation standards to provide services under the acquired brain injury, the Michelle P. waiver, the supports for community living, or the home and community based waiver programs.

IMPACT Plus providers shall bill for all IMPACT Plus services, including case management, under their IMPACT Plus provider identification. IMPACT Plus providers shall not be required to obtain a Medical Assistance Identification Number (MAID). Nothing in this section shall preclude an IMPACT Plus provider from applying for a MAID number, providing they meet all necessary criteria.

Medicaid managed care organizations may report documented gaps in IMPACT Plus services or lack of access to IMPACT Plus services to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities. The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall verify or not verify the reported gaps.

If the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities verifies gaps in IMPACT Plus services or lack of access to IMPACT Plus services, IMPACT Plus providers may be utilized for additional IMPACT Plus services and additional IMPACT Plus providers may be utilized.

History.
Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 118, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

205.528.
Hospital-to-Home Transition Program.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall submit a waiver or waiver amendment for approval to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in order to establish the Hospital-to-Home Transition Program to provide coverage for services provided by an approved Medicaid waiver provider to elderly and physically disabled persons over the age of eighteen (18) years. The program shall provide coverage for up to sixty (60) days for services not otherwise provided as part of the Medicaid essential benefits coverage in order to assist waiver applicants while transitioning from an institutional setting to their home or to a community setting.

The Hospital-to-Home Transition Program shall provide nonmedical support services to applicants, including but not limited to:

Adult day-care services;

Attendant services;

Home-delivered meal services; and

Transportation services.

The daily cost of services covered by the Hospital-to-Home Transition Program shall be less than the average daily Medicaid payment for a stay at a nursing facility.

An applicant shall be eligible for the Hospital-to-Home Transition Program if the applicant:

Is determined to be functionally eligible for services in his or her home or community setting; and

Has a pending application for Medicaid waiver services, provided that he or she complies with all other medical assistance application requirements.

The cabinet shall develop a screening tool to determine whether an applicant meets the eligibility criteria under subsection (4) of this section for the Hospital-to-Home Transition Program. The screening tool shall include but not be limited to the following:

Procedures for determining whether an applicant is functionally able to live at home or in a community setting;

Procedures for determining financial eligibility;

Procedures to address patient treatment preferences; and

Procedures to address patient goals of care and family caregiver concerns.

An applicant for the program shall:

Sign a written agreement attesting to the accuracy of the financial and other information that the applicant provides; and

Complete a Medicaid application on the date the applicant is screened for functional eligibility or not later than ten (10) days from the screening.

The cabinet shall make the Medicaid level of care final determination of eligibility for Medicaid and Medicaid waiver services by sixty (60) days following an eligible applicant’s discharge from an institutional setting to a home or community setting.

The cabinet shall request funding to support the waiver program. Not later than July 1, 2016, subject to appropriations provided by the General Assembly and approval of the waiver or waiver amendment from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the cabinet shall initiate the Hospital-to-Home Transition Program as described in this section.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2015 ch. 98, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

205.529.
Synchronization of multiple prescriptions for treatment of a chronic illness.

The Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide services pursuant to this chapter shall provide a program for synchronization of medications when it is agreed among the member, a provider, and a pharmacist that synchronization of multiple prescriptions for the treatment of a chronic illness is in the best interest of the patient for the management or treatment of a chronic illness provided that the medications:

Are covered by the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide services pursuant to this chapter;

Are used for treatment and management of chronic conditions that are subject to refills;

Are not a Schedule II controlled substance or a Schedule III controlled substance containing hydrocodone;

Meet all prior authorization criteria specific to the medications at the time of the synchronization request;

Are of a formulation that can be effectively split over required short fill periods to achieve synchronization; and

Do not have quantity limits or dose optimization criteria or requirements that would be violated in fulfilling synchronization.

When applicable to permit synchronization, the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide services pursuant to this chapter shall apply a prorated daily cost-sharing rate to any medication dispensed by a network pharmacy pursuant to this section.

Any dispensing fee shall not be prorated and shall be based on an individual prescription filled or refilled.

HISTORY:
2015 ch. 39, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

205.530.
Administration of medical assistance — Provisions. [Repealed.]

205.531.
Administrative hearings.

All administrative hearings conducted under KRS 205.510 to 205.645 shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 318, § 97, effective July 15, 1996.

205.532.
Definitions for KRS 205.532 to 205.536 — Contracts for Medicaid services by managed care organizations — Credentialing alliance — Clean application — Enrollment of and contracts with providers — Failure to agree on terms and conditions — Application date — Credentialing verification by university hospitals — Electronic verification of licensure information.

As used in KRS 205.532 to 205.536:

“Clean application” means:

For credentialing purposes, a credentialing application submitted by a provider to a credentialing verification organization that:

Is complete and correct;

Does not lack any required substantiating documentation; and

Is consistent with the requirements for the National Committee for Quality Assurance requirements; or

For enrollment purposes, an enrollment application submitted by a provider to the department that:

Is complete and correct;

Does not lack any required substantiating documentation;

Complies with all provider screening requirements pursuant to 42 C.F.R. pt. 455; and

Is on behalf of a provider who does not have accounts receivable with the department;

“Credentialing application date” means the date that a credentialing verification organization receives a clean application from a provider;

“Credentialing verification organization” means an organization that gathers data and verifies the credentials of providers in a manner consistent with federal and state laws and the requirements of the National Committee for Quality Assurance;

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Medicaid managed care organization” or “managed care organization” means an entity with which the department has contracted to serve as a managed care organization as defined in 42 C.F.R. sec. 438.2; and

“Provider” has the same meaning as in KRS 304.17A-700.

On and after January 1, 2019, every contract entered into or renewed for the delivery of Medicaid services by a managed care organization shall be in compliance with KRS 205.522, 205.532 to 205.536, and 304.17A-515.

The department shall formally recognize a credentialing alliance formed in the private sector that is:
(3) (a)

The department shall formally recognize a credentialing alliance formed in the private sector that is:

For the purpose of promoting a centralized process for credentialing providers;

Accredited by the National Committee for Quality Assurance; and

Owned by or affiliated with a statewide health care provider trade association that has at least one (1) year of experience providing credentialing services to at least one (1) Medicaid managed care organization in Kentucky.

A credentialing alliance shall:

Implement a single credentialing application via a Web-based portal available to all providers seeking to be credentialed for any Medicaid managed care organization that participates in the credentialing alliance;

Perform primary source verification and credentialing committee review of each credentialing application that results in a recommendation on the provider’s credentialing within thirty (30) days of receipt of a clean application;

Notify providers within five (5) business days of receipt of a credentialing application if the application is incomplete;

Provide provider outreach and help desk services during common business hours to facilitate provider applications and credentialing information;

Expeditiously communicate the credentialing recommendation and supporting credentialing information electronically to the department and to each participating Medicaid managed care organization with which the provider is seeking credentialing; and

Conduct reevaluation of provider documentation when required pursuant to state or federal law or when necessary for the provider to maintain participation status with a Medicaid managed care organization.

If on or before December 31, 2021, sixty percent (60%) or more, with any fraction of a percent rounded down, of the total number of Medicaid managed care organizations have entered into contracts with a credentialing alliance, the procurement provisions of this section shall be null and void and the department shall discontinue any contracts for credentialing verification services so that each Medicaid managed care organization shall bear its own costs for provider credentialing.

If a Medicaid managed care organization assumes responsibility and costs for their own provider credentialing pursuant to this subsection, the timely credentialing of providers shall be given significant weight as a factor in the scoring process when the department evaluates the Medicaid managed care organization’s response to requests for proposals for all contract awards.

The department shall enroll a provider within sixty (60) calendar days of receipt of a clean provider enrollment application. The date of enrollment shall be the date that the provider’s clean application was initially received by the department. The time limits established in this section shall be tolled or paused by a delay caused by an external entity. Tolling events include but are not limited to the screening requirements contained in 42 C.F.R. pt. 455 and searches of federal databases maintained by entities such as the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(4) (a)

The department shall enroll a provider within sixty (60) calendar days of receipt of a clean provider enrollment application. The date of enrollment shall be the date that the provider’s clean application was initially received by the department. The time limits established in this section shall be tolled or paused by a delay caused by an external entity. Tolling events include but are not limited to the screening requirements contained in 42 C.F.R. pt. 455 and searches of federal databases maintained by entities such as the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall:

Determine whether it will contract with the provider within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the verified credentialing information from a credentialing verification organization; and

Within ten (10) days of an executed contract, ensure that any internal processing systems of the managed care organization have been updated to include:
2. a.

Within ten (10) days of an executed contract, ensure that any internal processing systems of the managed care organization have been updated to include:

The accepted provider contract; and

The provider as a participating provider.

In the event that the loading and configuration of a contract with a provider will take longer than ten (10) days, the managed care organization may take an additional fifteen (15) days if it has notified the provider of the need for additional time.

Nothing in this section requires a Medicaid managed care organization to contract with a provider if the managed care organization and the provider do not agree on the terms and conditions for participation.
(5) (a)

Nothing in this section requires a Medicaid managed care organization to contract with a provider if the managed care organization and the provider do not agree on the terms and conditions for participation.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider and a managed care organization from negotiating the terms of a contract prior to the completion of the department’s enrollment and screening process.

For the purpose of reimbursement of claims, once a provider has met the terms and conditions for credentialing and enrollment, the provider’s credentialing application date shall be the date from which the provider’s claims become eligible for payment.
(6) (a)

For the purpose of reimbursement of claims, once a provider has met the terms and conditions for credentialing and enrollment, the provider’s credentialing application date shall be the date from which the provider’s claims become eligible for payment.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall not require a provider to appeal or resubmit any clean claim submitted during the time period between the provider’s credentialing application date and the completion of the credentialing process.

Nothing in this section shall limit the department’s authority to establish criteria that allow a provider’s claims to become eligible for payment in the event of lifesaving or life-preserving medical treatment, such as, for an illustrative but not exclusive example, an organ transplant.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a university hospital, as defined in KRS 205.639, from performing the activities of a credentialing verification organization for its employed physicians, residents, and mid-level practitioners where such activities are delineated in the hospital’s contract with a Medicaid managed care organization. The provisions of subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section with regard to payment and timely action on a credentialing application shall apply to a credentialing application that has been verified through a university hospital pursuant to this subsection.

To promote seamless integration of licensure information, the relevant provider licensing boards in Kentucky are encouraged to forward and provide licensure information electronically to the department and any credentialing verification organization.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 106, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 27, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 97, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

205.533.
Web site of managed care organization.

By January 1, 2019, a managed care organization shall establish an interactive Web site, operated by the managed care organization, that allows providers to file grievances, appeals, and supporting documentation electronically in an encrypted format that complies with federal law and that allows a provider to review the current status of a matter relating to an appeal or a grievance filed concerning a submitted claim.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 106, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

205.534.
Toll-free telephone line — Duties relating to adverse determinations — In-person meeting — Reprocessing claims — Internal appeals — Timely decisions on authorization and preauthorization requests — Monthly reports — Penalties.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall:

Provide:

A toll-free telephone line for providers to contact the insurer for claims resolution for forty (40) hours a week during normal business hours in this state;

A toll-free telephone line for providers to submit requests for authorizations of covered services during normal business hours and extended hours in this state on Monday and Friday through 6 p.m., including federal holidays;

With regard to any adverse payment or coverage determination, copies of all documents, records, and other information relevant to a determination, including medical necessity criteria and any processes, strategies, or evidentiary standards relied upon, if requested by the provider. Documents, records, and other information required to be provided under this paragraph shall be provided at no cost to the provider; and

For any adverse payment or coverage determination, a written reply in sufficient detail to inform the provider of all reasons for the determination. The written reply shall include information about the provider’s right to request and receive at no cost to the provider documents, records, and other information under subparagraph 3. of this paragraph;

Afford each participating provider the opportunity for an in-person meeting with a representative of the managed care organization on:

Any clean claim that remains unpaid in violation of KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730; and

Any claim that remains unpaid for forty-five (45) days or more after the date the claim is received by the managed care organization and that individually or in the aggregate exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);

Reprocess claims that are incorrectly paid or denied in error, in compliance with KRS 304.17A-708. The reprocessing shall not require a provider to rebill or resubmit claims to obtain correct payment. No claim shall be denied for timely filing if the initial claim was timely submitted; and

Establish processes for internal appeals, including provisions for:

Allowing a provider to file any grievance or appeal related to the reduction or denial of the claim within sixty (60) days of receipt of a notification from the managed care organization that payment for a submitted claim has been reduced or denied; and

Ensuring the timely consideration and disposition of any grievance or any appeal within thirty (30) days from the date the grievance or appeal is filed with the managed care organization by a provider under this paragraph.

For the purposes of this subsection:
(2) (a)

For the purposes of this subsection:

“Timely” means that an authorization or preauthorization request shall be approved:

For an expedited authorization request, within seventy-two (72) hours after receipt of the request. The timeframe for an expedited authorization request may be extended by up to fourteen (14) days if:

The enrollee requests an extension; or

The Medicaid managed care organization justifies to the department a need for additional information and how the extension is in the enrollee’s interest; and

For a standard authorization request, within two (2) business days. The timeframe for a standard authorization request may be extended by up to fourteen (14) additional days if:

The provider or enrollee requests an extension; or

The Medicaid managed care organization justifies to the department a need for additional information and how the extension is in the enrollee’s interest; and

“Expedited authorization request” means a request for authorization or preauthorization where the provider determines that following the standard a timeframe could seriously jeopardize an enrollee’s life or health, or ability to attain, maintain, or regain maximum function; and
2. a.

“Expedited authorization request” means a request for authorization or preauthorization where the provider determines that following the standard a timeframe could seriously jeopardize an enrollee’s life or health, or ability to attain, maintain, or regain maximum function; and

A request for authorization or preauthorization for treatment of an enrollee with a diagnosis of substance use disorder shall be considered an expedited authorization request by the provider and the managed care organization.

A decision by a managed care organization on an authorization or preauthorization request for physical, behavioral, or other medically necessary services shall be made in a timely and consistent manner so that Medicaid members with comparable medical needs receive a comparable, consistent level, amount, and duration of services as supported by the member’s medical condition, records, and previous affirmative coverage decisions.

Each managed care organization shall report on a monthly basis to the department:
(3) (a)

Each managed care organization shall report on a monthly basis to the department:

The number and dollar value of claims received that were denied, suspended, or approved for payment;

The number of requests for authorization of services and the number of such requests that were approved and denied;

The number of internal appeals and grievances filed by members and by providers and the type of service related to the grievance or appeal, the time of resolution, the number of internal appeals and grievances where the initial denial was overturned and the type of service and dollar amount associated with the overturned denials; and

Any other information required by the department.

The data required in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be separately reported by provider category, as prescribed by the department, and shall at a minimum include inpatient acute care hospital services, inpatient psychiatric hospital services, outpatient hospital services, residential behavioral health services, and outpatient behavioral health services.

On a monthly basis, the department shall transmit to the Department of Insurance a report of each corrective action plan, fine, or sanction assessed against a Medicaid managed care organization for violation of a Medicaid managed care organization’s contract relating to prompt payment of claims. The Department of Insurance shall then make a determination of whether the contract violation was also a violation of KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730.

Any Medicaid managed care organization that fails to comply with KRS 205.522, 205.532 to 205.536, and 304.17A-515 may be subject to fines, penalties, and sanctions, up to and including termination, as established under its Medicaid managed care contract with the department.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 106, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

205.535.
Medicaid enrollee not automatically assigned to managed care organization.

The department shall not automatically assign a Medicaid enrollee to a managed care organization.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 106, § 4, effective January 1, 2019.

205.536.
Utilization review — Prohibition against prospective or concurrent review of prescription drug for alcohol or opioid use disorder.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall have a utilization review plan, as defined in KRS 304.17A-600, that meets the requirements established in 42 C.F.R. pts. 431, 438, and 456. If the Medicaid managed care organization utilizes a private review agent, as defined in KRS 304.17A-600, the agent shall comply with all applicable requirements of KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633.

In conducting utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits, each Medicaid managed care organization shall use the medical necessity criteria selected by the Department of Insurance pursuant to KRS 304.38-240, for making determinations of medical necessity and clinical appropriateness pursuant to the utilization review plan required by subsection (1) of this section.

To the extent consistent with the federal regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section, the Department for Medicaid Services or any managed care organization contracted to provide Medicaid benefits pursuant to KRS Chapter 205 shall not require or conduct a prospective or concurrent review, as defined in KRS 304.17A-600, for a prescription drug:

That:

Is used in the treatment of alcohol or opioid use disorder; and

Contains Methadone, Buprenorphine, or Naltrexone; or

That was approved before January 1, 2022, by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the mitigation of opioid withdrawal symptoms.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 106, § 5, effective January 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 201, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

205.538.
Statistics report on cancer services for colorectal cancer among Medicaid recipients.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall present statistics on cancer services related to colorectal cancer among Medicaid recipients to the Colon Cancer Screening and Prevention Advisory Committee annually and upon request.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 130, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.